fr: Maison et jardin > Éclairage > Appareils d’éclairage: Fixations pour éclairage sous meuble; Plafonniers; Lustres; Suspensions lumineuses; Luminaires encastrés; Lampe murales
sv: Hem och trädgård > Belysning > Lamphållare: Skåplamparmaturer; Taklamphållare; Takkronor; Pendellampor; Infällda armaturer; Vägglamphållare
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Aydınlatma > Aydınlatma Teçhizatı: Dolap Aydınlatma Teçhizatları; Tavan Aydınlatma Teçhizatı; Avizeler; Sarkıt Aydınlatma Armatürleri; Gömme Aydınlatma Armatürleri; Duvar Aydınlatma Teçhizatı
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Razsvetljava > Svetilke: Svetila za omarice; Stropna svetila; Lestenci; Obešalne luči; Vgradne svetilke; Stenska svetila
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Osvetlenie > Svietidlá: Skriňové svietidlá; Stropné svietidlá; Lustre; Závesné svietidlá; Podhľadové svietidlá; Nástenné svietidlá
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 조명 > 조명 기구: 수납장 하부 조명; 천장 조명 기구; 샹들리에; 펜던트 조명 기구; 매립형 조명 기구; 벽면 조명 기구
vi: Nhà và vườn > Đèn chiếu sáng > Thiết bị chiếu sáng: Đèn tủ; Thiết bị chiếu sáng ốp trần; Đèn chùm; Đèn treo; Đèn âm trần; Thiết bị chiếu sáng tường
nl: Huis en tuin > Verlichting > Lichtarmaturen: Kastverlichting; Plafondverlichting; Kroonluchters; Hanglampen; Inbouwverlichtingsarmaturen; Muurverlichting
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Iluminat > Corpuri de iluminat: Corpuri de iluminat pentru dulapuri; Corpuri de iluminat pentru tavan; Candelabre; Corpuri de iluminat suspendate; Spoturi încastrate; Corpuri de iluminat de perete
es: Casa y jardín > Iluminación > Lámparas: Iluminación bajo muebles; Apliques de techo; Lámparas de araña; Lámparas colgantes; Luminarias empotradas; Apliques de pared
da: Hjem og have > Belysning > Belysning – beslag: Lampebeslag til skabe; Loftslampebeslag; Lysekroner; Loftlampebeslag; Indbyggede lysarmaturer; Væglampebeslag
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 照明 > 燈具: 櫥櫃內燈; 天花板燈座; 吊燈; 吊燈固定件; 崁燈; 壁燈固定座
pl: Dom i ogród > Oświetlenie > Oprawy oświetleniowe: Lampy meblowe; Sufitowe oprawy oświetleniowe; Żyrandole; Lampy sufitowe wiszące; Oprawy wpuszczane; Ścienne oprawy oświetleniowe
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 照明设备 > 室内灯饰: 橱柜灯具; 吸顶灯具; 吊灯; 吊灯; 嵌入式灯具; 壁灯灯具
de: Heim & Garten > Beleuchtung > Leuchten: Unterbauleuchten; Deckenleuchten; Kronleuchter; Pendelleuchten; Einbauleuchten; Wandleuchten, Wandbeleuchtung
cs: Dům a zahrada > Osvětlení > Svítidla: Nábytkové osvětlení; Stropní svítidla; Lustry; Závěsná svítidla; Vestavná svítidla; Uchycení nástěnných svítidel
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Iluminação > Instalações de iluminação: Instalações de luzes para gabinete; Instalações de luzes de teto; Candelabro; Luminárias pendentes; Luminárias embutidas; Luzes de parede
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Apšvietimas > Šviestuvai: Spintelių šviestuvai; Lubiniai šviestuvai; Sietynai; Pakabinami šviestuvai; Įleidžiami šviestuvai; Sieniniai šviestuvai
ru: Дом и сад > Освещение > Светильники: Светильники для шкафов; Потолочные светильники; Люстры; Крепления для подвесных свительников; Встраиваемые светильники; Настенные светильники
hu: Otthon és kert > Világítás > Világítótestek: Szekrény-világítótestek; Mennyezet-világítótestek; Csillárok; Függesztett lámpatestek; Süllyesztett lámpatestek; Falvilágítótestek
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 照明 > 照明器具: 棚下照明器具; 天井照明器具; シャンデリア; ペンダント照明器具; 埋め込み式照明器具; 壁付け照明器具
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Φωτισμός > Φωτιστικά: Φωτιστικά ντουλαπιών; Φωτιστικά οροφής; Πολυέλαιοι; Κρεμαστά φωτιστικά; Χωνευτά φωτιστικά; Φωτιστικά τοίχου
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Rasvjeta > Rasvjetna tijela: Podelementna rasvjeta; Stropna rasvjeta; Lusteri; Viseća rasvjeta; Ugradbene svjetiljke; Zidna rasvjeta
nb: Hjem og hage > Lyssetting > Lysarmaturer: Lysarmaturer for skap; Lysarmaturer for tak; Lysekroner; Hengende lamper; Innfelte lysarmaturer; Lysarmaturer for vegg
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Iluminação > Luminárias: Iluminação para armários; Iluminação de teto; Candelabros; Iluminação suspensa; Iluminação embutida; Iluminação de parede
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Valaistus > Valaisimien kiinnitys: Työtasovalaisinten kiinnikkeet; Kattovalaisinten kiinnikkeet; Kattokruunut; Kattovalaisimien kiinnikkeet; Upotettavat valaisimet; Seinavalaisimien kiinnittimet
en: Home & Garden > Lighting > Lighting Fixtures: Cabinet Light Fixtures; Ceiling Light Fixtures; Chandeliers; Pendant Light Fixtures; Recessed Light Fixtures; Wall Light Fixtures
it: Casa e giardino > Illuminazione > Impianti di illuminazione: Illuminazioni per armadio; Impianti da soffitto; Lampadari; Lampade a sospensione; Apparecchi di illuminazione da incasso; Illuminazione a parete
th: บ้านและสวน > ไฟ > โคมไฟและอุปกรณ์แสงสว่าง: ที่ติดตั้งไฟสำหรับตู้; อุปกรณ์ติดตั้งไฟบนเพดาน; โคมระย้า; อุปกรณ์ติดโคมไฟห้อยเพดาน; โคมไฟฝังเพดาน; อุปกรณ์ติดไฟบนผนัง
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Осветление > Осветителни тела: Осветителни тела за шкафове; Таванни осветителни тела; Полилеи; Висящи осветителни тела; Вградени осветителни тела; Стенни осветителни тела